Hawaii statutes.
§342D-31 Administrative penalties.
(a) In addition to any other administrative or judicial remedy provided by
this chapter, or by rules adopted under this chapter, the director is
authorized to impose by order the penalties specified in section 342D-30.

(b) Factors to be considered in imposing an
administrative penalty include:

(1) The nature, circumstances, extent, gravity, and
history of the violation and of any prior violations;

(2) The economic benefit to the violator, or
anticipated by the violator, resulting from the violation;

(3) The opportunity, difficulty, and history of
corrective action;

(4) Good faith efforts to comply;

(5) Degree of culpability; and

(6) Such other matters as justice may require.

(c) It is presumed that the violator's
economic and financial conditions allow payment of the penalty, and the burden
of proof to the contrary is on the violator. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §2; am L
1994, c 269, §2; am L 1995, c 180, §13; am L 1999, c 193, §9]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next